Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-617
Certified nurse midwife; right to use title or abbreviation.

Any person who holds a license to practice nurse midwifery in this state shall have the right to use the title certified nurse midwife and the abbreviation CNM. No other person shall use such title or abbreviation to indicate that he or she is licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice certified nurse midwifery.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1756;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 229.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.